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DTC P0340/12 Engine Speed Sensor Circuit 1 (TDC or G1
Circuit)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0335/13 on page DI−56.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0340/12 NoTDCsignal toengineECUat400rpmormore
SOpenorshort incrankshaftpositionsensorcircuit
SCrankshaftpositionsensor
SEngineECU

Reference: INSPECTIONUSINGOSCILLOSCOPE
During cranking or idling, check between terminals TDC+ and
TDC− of theengineECU.
HINT:
The correct waveforms are as shown.

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC P0335/13 on page DI−56.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkresistanceofcrankshaftpositionsensor (TDC) (SeePubNo.RM6 17E,
pageED −8).

NG Replace crankshaft position sensor.

OK

2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
crankshaft position sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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3 Inspect sensor installation.

NG Tighten sensor.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


